Hawaii, session 2026, GM1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 502-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (d) and (e) to read as follows:
"(d) On receipt for recordation of a transfer or separate
description document concerning a lot in a subdivision, the
registrar shall accept and file the document with:
(1) A metes and bounds description, either solely or as
part of the document; and
(2) A county certified plat map, unless the land is being
deregistered pursuant to part II of chapter 501 [-;—and
-{-3-)- A letter from a—lieenoed pj?ofGssiona-l--&«rvcyor,
certifying that the mefeeo and bounds deoeription
ooft-fo-rmo—to -the-aeeompan-ying plot mop] .
The document shall otherwise comply with the requirements
for recordation under this section. Any parcel created or
subdivided before the effective date of the subdivision laws of
the respective counties is exempt from the provisions of this
subsection.
2026-2510 SB3067 GDI SMA.docx
iniiiiHMiiniMiiiuiiiiHii

Page 2 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(e) For checking the survey and plan as to form and
mathematical correctness, the department shall charge [4S—aft
hour] a fee pursuant to rules adopted by the department of
accounting and general services, and shall require the owner of
the land to deposit the [ootimatod] cost thereof before [making
Duch chock.] a££rovjji2 yi®sii£vey and plan^"
SECTION 2. Section 502-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§502-18 Description; lot sxibdivisions. A metes and
bounds description of the exterior boundaries of the parcel or
parcels of land sought to be registered as a file plan shall be
written upon the plan, or printed or typewritten on unruled good
quality white paper 11 inches long by 8 1/2 inches wide and
shall be filed [ift—duplieato] with the file plan. The metes and
bounds description shall be dated and signed by the licensed
professional surveyor making the field survey, or under whose
supervision the field survey was executed. If the land sought
to be registered as a file plan is being deregistered pursuant
to part II of chapter 501, the metes and bounds description
shall be dated and signed by the licensed professional surveyor
making the file plan, or under whose supervision the file plan
2026-2510 SB3067 CDl SMA.docx 2
liiiiiiHiiniiiouin

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
was made. The boundaries of the land platted shall be described
as running from left to right (clockwise) and the azimuth system
shall be used in designating the courses of the survey with zero
or 360 degrees at due South; 90 degrees at due West; 180 degrees
at due North; 270 degrees at due East. Any printed or
typewritten description filed separately with the file plan
shall be recorded in the registry system and the book and page
or document number thereof noted on the file plan. Expense of
recordation shall be charged to the owner. The initial point in
the description shall clearly show the connection with the
government triangulation system. All outside corners of the
tract shall be substantially marked by monuments in the ground,
where practicable; unless the land is being deregistered
pursuant to part II of chapter 501. In all cases where tracts
of land are subdivided into lots, with the intention of
conveying separate lots by lot number and reference to the plat,
it is necessary to show the true azimuths and lengths of all
principal lines and the lot areas. A sufficient number of
durable monuments shall be placed in the ground so as to
accurately identify each lot, unless the land is being
deregistered pursuant to part II of chapter 501. Any lands
2026-2510 SB3067 CDl SMA.docx 3
IIUIIIIMIIIIIMIIilini

Page 4 S.B. NO. 3067
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
being deregistered pursuant to part II of chapter 501 shall not
subdivide or consolidate when registering as a file plan[7—snd
only Gontiguoua parccla shall bo-shown on-the ocime plan] . Only
contiguous parcels shall be shown on the same plan unless the
department of accounting and general services determines that an
exception would be appropriate."
SECTION 3. Section 502-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§502-19 Plans on [fegacing cloth;] tangible medium; size;
scale. All plans [must] shaJA be on [tracing cloth of good
qt»ali-ty, ] a tangible medium of good quality, approved by the
department of accounting and general services, and shall be of
one of the following sizes, the figures indicating inches: 10 x
15; 15 X 21; 21 x 32; 30 x 36; 36 x 42; or [4S-r-^4S-r-e«^-54] 3^
wide without restriction as to length; which plans shall be
prepared and drawn according to [oomc] one of the following
scales: 10, 20, 30, 40, 50, 100, 200, 300, 400, 500, 600^
1000, 2000, 3000, 4000, [eg] 5000, or 6000 feet to an inch."
SECTION 4. Section 502-20, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-2510 SB3067 CDl SMA.docx 4
liliMIMIIiOin

Pages S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"§502-20 New maps for old. The registrar [at such timeo
vjhon the er-iginal tracinga of] shall forward filed plans and
land court maps on file in the bureau of conveyances [7-] to the
department of accounting and general services, when the original
tracings of the plans or maps are found to be in [such] ti^
condition that satisfactory [blueprint] copies thereof cannot be
made [ -7—shaii—afty—er—deper^feifteftt—ef
accounting and general services of the State], with the request
that another [tracing] copy of good quality thereof be made.
The department, on receipt of the request and map or plan, shall
prepare another [trraeiftg] copy thereof [7—and shall] on a
tangible medium of good quality, certify that the same is a true
copy of the original on file in the bureau of conveyances, and
[ehaii] file the same [7—t-egether-with two certified blueprint
copies, ] with the registrar]-;—Any such] ; provided that any
certified [tracing] copy of a map or plan shall thereafter be
regarded for all purposes as the original."
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2510 SB3067 CDl SMA.docx 5
IIIIIIIIIIUIIIIIIIOIlfl[dlUIDI!l

S.B. NO 3067
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2026

S.B. No. 3067, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
82-26

SB No. 3067, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives